Mississippi, session 2026, HB731.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  On Interstate-10 in Jackson County, Mississippi, where the east and west exit entrances are located into the incorporated limits of Moss Point and, additionally, on the north entrance into the incorporated limits of Moss Point located on Hwy 63 North exiting of Lucedale, George County, Mississippi, shall be erected a sign or signs that reads as follows:  "Home of Devin Booker, 2020/2024 U.S. Men's Basketball Olympic Gold Medalist, Moss Point High School Graduate." (2)  The sign or signs described in subsection (1) of this section are to be erected in accordance with the Mississippi Department of Transportation's permitting process and must be paid for by Jackson County. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.